Illinois, session 104th, HB3585.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $30,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 7made for such purpose in Article 165, Section 90 of Public Act 8103-0006, as amended, is reappropriated from the Build 9Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity for a grant to Woodlawn Central LLC for 11pre-development, engineering, and construction. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.